South Dakota, session 2026, HB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-6:
A resident of this state who is an active-duty member of the armed of forces of the
United States or a veteran who was discharged from active service in the armed forces of
the United States under conditions other than dishonorable is exempt from paying any
resident fishing license fee required by the Game, Fish and Parks Commission, pursuant
to § 41-6-10.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.